Maryland, session 2026, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Caregiver” means an individual who provides care or support to a
qualified family member.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(4) “Qualified family member” means an individual who:
(i) requires assistance with one or more daily living activities, as
certified by a licensed physician, physician assistant, or registered nurse practitioner; and
(ii) 1. is at least 60 years old and is cared for by an adult relative
or informal caregiver who is at least 18 years old;
2. has Alzheimer’s disease or a related disorder and is cared
for by an adult relative or informal caregiver who is at least 18 years old;
3. is a child with developmental or functional disabilities and
is cared for by a parent, grandparent, or other relative; or
4. is an adult with developmental or functional disabilities
and is cared for by a parent, grandparent, or other relative.
(b) (1) The Office of the Comptroller University of Maryland, College Park,
with assistance from the Department, shall study and make recommendations on the
feasibility of establishing and operating a Supporting Our Caregiver Infrastructure
Program to provide universal monthly payments to a caregiver for each dependent for
whom a caregiver provides care.
– 1 –

Ch. 704 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In conducting the study required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Office of the Comptroller University of Maryland, College Park, in
consultation with the Office of the Comptroller, shall examine the economic impact on the
State and local economies, including:
(i) potential increased labor force participation;
(ii) enhanced tax revenues;
(iii) potential decreased participation in public benefits programs in
the State; and
(iv) the overall economic vitality of the State.
(3) The University of Maryland, College Park shall explore appropriate
amounts for caregiver stipends that maximize the benefit to the State economy and
minimize the fiscal impact on the State budget.
(3) (4) The Department shall assist the Office of the Comptroller University of
Maryland, College Park in conducting the study required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection by:
(i) identifying available and potential federal, State, and local
funding sources for the program;
(ii) identifying the administrative needs, administrative costs, and
operating costs associated with the development and implementation of the program; and
(iii) exploring appropriate amounts for caregiver stipends that
maximize the benefit to the State economy and minimize the fiscal impact on the State
budget; and
(iv) (iii) consulting with:
1. the Maryland Department of Aging;
2. the Maryland Department of Health; and
3. local agencies on aging and disabilities, including a unit of
local government or a private, nonprofit corporation.
(c) On or before July 1, 2027 2028, the Office of the Comptroller University of
Maryland, College Park shall submit a final report of its findings, conclusions, and
recommendations to the Senate Finance Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee, the House Appropriations Committee, and the House Health Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 704
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028
2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –